Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-115
Local exchange area, defined.

Local exchange area means a territorial unit established by a telecommunications company for the administration of telecommunications service within a specific area generally encompassing a city or village and its environs as described in maps filed with and approved by the commission.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 16.